Resources/ta_IN.aff
SFX F   0    துகொள்கின்றோம்/y       .
SFX F   0    துகொள்கின்றாய்/y         .
SFX F   0    துகொள்கின்றீர்/y         .
SFX F   0    துகொள்கின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0    துகொள்கின்றான்/y         .
SFX F   0    துகொள்கின்றாள்/y        .
SFX F   0    துகொள்கின்றார்/y        .
SFX F   0    துகொள்கின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0    துகொள்கின்றது/y        .
SFX F   0    துகொள்கின்றன/y       .
SFX F   0    துகொள்வேன்/y       .
SFX F   0    துகொள்வோம்/y       .
SFX F   0    துகொள்வாய்/y         .
SFX F   0    துகொள்வீர்/y         .
SFX F   0    துகொள்வீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0    துகொள்வான்/y         .
SFX F   0    துகொள்வாள்/y        .
SFX F   0    துகொள்வார்/y        .
SFX F   0    துகொள்வார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0    துகொள்ளும்/y        .
SFX F   0      துபோ/y        .
SFX F   0      துபோனேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துபோனோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துபோனாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோனீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோனீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோனான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோனாள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோனார்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோனார்கள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துபோனது/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோயிற்று/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோயின/y        .
SFX F   0      துபோகிறேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துபோகிறோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துபோகிறாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோகிறீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோகிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோகிறான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோகிறாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துபோகிறார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துபோகிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோகிறது/y        .
SFX F   0      துபோகிறன/y       .
SFX F   0      துபோகின்றேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துபோகின்றோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துபோகின்றாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோகின்றீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோகின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோகின்றான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோகின்றாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துபோகின்றார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துபோகின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோகின்றது/y        .
SFX F   0      துபோகின்றன/y       .
SFX F   0      துபோவேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துபோவோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துபோவாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோவீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோவீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோவான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோவாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துபோவார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துபோவார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துபோகும்/y        .
SFX F   0     துவிடு/y       .
SFX F   0     துவிட்டேன்/y       .
SFX F   0     துவிட்டோம்/y       .
SFX F   0     துவிட்டாய்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிட்டீர்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிட்டீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிட்டான்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிட்டாள்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிட்டார்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிட்டார்கள்/y        .
SFX F   0     துவிட்டது/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிட்டன/y        .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகிறேன்/y       .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகிறோம்/y       .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகிறாய்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகிறீர்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகிறான்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகிறாள்/y        .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகிறார்/y        .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகிறது/y        .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகிறன/y       .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகின்றேன்/y       .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகின்றோம்/y       .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகின்றாய்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகின்றீர்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகின்றான்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகின்றாள்/y        .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகின்றார்/y        .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகின்றது/y        .
SFX F   0     துவிடுகின்றன/y       .
SFX F   0     துவிடுவேன்/y       .
SFX F   0     துவிடுவோம்/y       .
SFX F   0     துவிடுவாய்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிடுவீர்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிடுவீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிடுவான்/y        .
SFX F   0     துவிடுவாள்/y        .
SFX F   0     துவிடுவார்/y        .
SFX F   0     துவிடுவார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0     துவிடும்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிரு/y        .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருந்தேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருந்தோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருந்தாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருந்தீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருந்தீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருந்தான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருந்தாள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருந்தார்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருந்தார்கள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருந்தது/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருந்தன/y        .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கிறேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கிறோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கிறாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கிறீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கிறான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கிறாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கிறார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கிறது/y        .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கிறன/y       .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கின்றேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கின்றோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கின்றாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கின்றீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கின்றான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கின்றாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கின்றார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கின்றது/y        .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கின்றன/y       .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருப்பேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருப்போம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருப்பாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருப்பீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருப்பீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருப்பான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருப்பாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருப்பார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருப்பார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகொண்டிருக்கும்/y        .
SFX F   0      தாயிற்று/y        .
SFX F   0      துதொலை/y       .
SFX F   0      துதொலைந்தேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதொலைந்தோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதொலைந்தாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைந்தீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைந்தீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைந்தான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைந்தாள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைந்தார்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைந்தார்கள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதொலைந்தது/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைந்தன/y        .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகிறேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகிறோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகிறாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகிறீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகிறான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகிறாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகிறார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகிறது/y        .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகிறன/y       .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகின்றேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகின்றோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகின்றாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகின்றீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகின்றான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகின்றாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகின்றார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகின்றது/y        .
SFX F   0      துதொலைகின்றன/y       .
SFX F   0      துதொலைவேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதொலைவோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதொலைவாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைவீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைவீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைவான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலைவாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதொலைவார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதொலைவார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதொலையும்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளு/y        .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளினேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளினோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளினாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளினீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளினீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளினான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளினாள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளினார்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளினார்கள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளியது/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளிற்று/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளின/y        .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகிறேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகிறோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகிறாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகிறீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகிறான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகிறாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகிறார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகிறது/y        .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகிறன/y       .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகின்றேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகின்றோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகின்றாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகின்றீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகின்றான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகின்றாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகின்றார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகின்றது/y        .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுகின்றன/y       .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுவேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுவோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுவாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுவீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுவீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுவான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுவாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுவார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளுவார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துதள்ளும்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகிழி/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழித்தேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழித்தோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழித்தாய்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழித்தீர்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழித்தீர்கள்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழித்தான்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழித்தாள்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழித்தார்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழித்தார்கள்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழித்தது/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழித்தன/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கிறேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கிறோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கிறாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கிறீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கிறீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கிறான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கிறாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கிறார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கிறார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கிறது/y        .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கிறன/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கின்றேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கின்றோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கின்றாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கின்றீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கின்றீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கின்றான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கின்றாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கின்றார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கின்றார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கின்றது/y        .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கின்றன/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழிப்பேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழிப்போம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிழிப்பாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிப்பீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிப்பீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிப்பான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிப்பாள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகிழிப்பார்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகிழிப்பார்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிழிக்கும்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகிட/y        .
SFX F   0      துகிடந்தேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிடந்தோம்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிடந்தாய்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிடந்தீர்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிடந்தீர்கள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிடந்தான்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிடந்தாள்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிடந்தார்/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிடந்தார்கள்/y        .
SFX F   0      துகிடந்தது/y         .
SFX F   0      துகிடந்தன/y        .
SFX F   0      துகிடக்கிறேன்/y       .
SFX F   0      துகிடக்கிறோம்/y       .
